California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(a) The district may, in any year, levy assessments, reassessments, or special taxes and issue bonds to finance waterway construction projects and related operations and maintenance, or operations and maintenance projects independent of construction projects in accordance with, and pursuant to, the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Benefit Assessment Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.4 (commencing with Section 54703) of the Government Code), the Integrated Financing District Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 53175) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and the Marks-Roos Local Bond Pooling Act of 1985 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Sections 5116, 5117, 5118, 5119, 5190, 5191, 5192, 5193, 10104, and 10302 of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to assessment proceedings undertaken pursuant to this section. 

(c) Notwithstanding the related provisions of any assessment act which the district is authorized to use, any assessment diagram which any of those acts requires to be prepared prior to final approval of the assessment district may show only the exterior boundaries of the assessment district and the boundaries of any assessment zones or improvement areas within the district. The diagram may refer to the county assessor’s maps and records for a detailed description of each lot or parcel. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district may levy and collect assessments and reassessments in the same manner as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code, to pay any or all of the following:

(1) For the operation and maintenance of projects, including maintenance of lands, easements, rights-of-way, dredge material disposal areas, and remediation. 

(2) For the satisfaction of liabilities arising from projects.

(3) To accumulate a fund which may be used to advance the cost of district projects, provided that the advances be repaid, with interest as determined by the commissioners, from assessments, reassessments, special taxes, or fees charged by the district pursuant to this section. 

(4) To acquire real property, easements, or rights-of-way for a navigation project or the maintenance of a navigation project. 

(5) To acquire real property within the district for disposal of dredged material.

(e) For purposes of this section, functions designated by Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code to be performed by the board of supervisors, the board of trustees, or valuation commissioners shall be performed by the district’s board. 

(f) For purposes of this section, the board may order the creation of a separate assessment roll to pay the allowable expenses of any single project or any group or system of projects. 

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all assessments, reassessments, and taxes levied by the district may be collected together with, and not separately from, taxes for county purposes. Any county in which the district is located may collect, at the request of the district, all assessments, reassessments, and special taxes levied by the district and shall cause those revenues to be deposited into the county treasury to the credit of the district. Each county may deduct its reasonable collection and administrative costs. 

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any assessment or reassessment levied pursuant to this section may be apportioned on the basis of land use category, tonnage shipped on the waterway, size and type of vessel using the waterway, front footage, acreage, capital improvements, or other reasonable basis, separately or in combination, as determined by the district commissioners. 

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to any assessment levied by the district. 

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bond issued pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the routine maintenance dredging of channels.

(k) Any assessment levied pursuant to subdivision (a) or (d) to be payable in two or more installments over a period of greater than one year shall be authorized by a five-sevenths or greater vote of all of the members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 18.3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Claims and Demands [6960. - 6963.]

6960.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto. All claims not governed thereby shall be filed with the auditor on forms and blanks prescribed by him. A claim shall not be paid without the endorsement of the auditor certifying to its correctness.

The auditor shall keep a record, which shall be a public one, of all claims against the district showing by whom made, for what purpose, the amount thereof and when paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

6961.

If there is not sufficient money in any fund to pay the claims made against the fund, the claim shall be registered in a book kept by the treasurer, showing its number, when presented, date, amount, name of payee, and on what account allowed and out of what fund payable. When so registered, the claim shall be returned to the party presenting it with the endorsement of the word “Registered” dated and signed by the treasurer. All registered claims are payable in the order of their registration.

This section does not prevent the payment by the treasurer of bonds of the district or of any city or county, and interest coupons thereof, in accordance with the Constitution of this State and the provisions of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6962.

Wages and salaries shall be paid at such intervals as the board may direct, but at least once each month.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6963.

The provisions of Chapter I, Division II of the District Organization Act relating to notices shall govern and control this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. SMALL CRAFT HARBOR DISTRICTS [7000. - 7340.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7000. - 7005.]

7000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Small Craft Harbor District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7001.

This part and all of its provisions shall be liberally construed to the end that its purpose may be effective. This part does not affect any other law covering the same subject, nor apply to any proceedings had thereunder, nor does it in any manner interfere with existing harbors or prevent the formation, operation or government of harbors within the State under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.

“Harbor” means a portion of the Pacific Ocean or inland waters, including rivers, streams, lakes, bays, estuaries, inlets, straits and other waters within the jurisdiction of the State, naturally or artificially protected or capable of being artificially protected so as to be a place of safety for vessels, including the artificially protective works, the public lands underlying, washed by, ashore of, or abutting any of said waters and the structures and facilities provided within, beneath, abutting or ashore of any enclosed body of any of said waters for any of the uses or purposes set forth in Section 7149, including the moving and servicing of vessels and the servicing of their crews and passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7003.

“District” means any small craft harbor district formed pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7004.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7005.

“Develop” and “development” includes without limitation the acquisition, construction, repair, leasing improvement or any combination thereof necessary to create or develop a harbor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation [7010. - 7037.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition [7010. - 7014.]

7010.

A district may be formed consisting of any portion or portions of a county, whether contiguous or not, lying entirely within a city or entirely within unincorporated territory of the county or wholly or partially including territory of all or part of one or more cities within the county, including within its boundaries the whole or some part of the harbor proposed to be developed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.

Fifty or more registered, qualified electors in a county residing within the proposed district may sign and present to the board of supervisors of the county a petition in writing for the formation of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7012.

The petition shall:

(a) Set forth the exterior boundaries of the proposed district.

(b) Generally describe the proposed harbor development.

(c) A request that the territory included within the described boundaries be formed into a district pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7013.

Within 10 days from the filing thereof the county registrar of voters, or if there be none, the county clerk, shall examine the petition and report in writing to the board of supervisors as to the sufficiency thereof. If the report shows the petition to be insufficient a supplemental petition may be filed within one month from the date of the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7014.

If the report shows the petition to be sufficient the petition shall be published as provided in Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed district is located together with a notice setting forth the day, hour and place at which the petition will be heard by the board of supervisors and stating that at the designated time and place all persons interested may appear and be heard. The notice shall also state that any interested person, including any owner of taxable real property within the proposed district, may file with the clerk of the body conducting the hearing at any time prior to the time fixed for the hearing a written protest or objection to the formation of the district. The names of only three signers of the petition need be published. The time fixed for the hearing shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the first publication of the petition and notice of hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [7020. - 7025.]

7020.

At the time and place specified in the notice the board of supervisors shall hold the hearing, consider the petition and may continue the hearing from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7021.

At the hearing the board of supervisors, without further notice, may change the exterior boundaries of the proposed district, as set forth in the petition, by excluding lands which would not be benefited by the proposed harbor development.

The board of supervisors may also change the exterior boundaries of the proposed district by adding to the district and including therein other lands which will be benefited by the proposed harbor development. Land may not be added to the proposed district unless notice is given by the board of supervisors of the proposed addition or additions to the district by publication of its intention to do so. The notice shall contain a description of the additional lands to be included in the proposed district, and it shall state the day, hour and place for the owners of land within the proposed addition to appear before the board of supervisors and state their objections, if any, to the inclusion. The notice shall be published as provided in Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed district is located, the first publication to be at least 15 days before the day so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7022.

If the territory included within the proposed district lies entirely within one city, the petition shall be filed with the city clerk and the clerk and the legislative body of the city shall conduct all the formation proceedings in the same manner as herein provided for the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7023.

Except for proceedings to which Section 7022 applies, no territory lying within a city may be included in a district formed pursuant to this part without the consent of the city given by its legislative body, and filed with the board of supervisors prior to the adoption by the board of supervisors of the resolution provided for in Section 7024.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7023.5.

If, prior to the time fixed for the hearing, the owners of taxable real property in the proposed district having an assessed valuation of more than one-half of the assessed valuation of all taxable real property in the proposed district have filed with the clerk of the body conducting the hearing written protest or objection to the formation of the district, the body conducting the hearing shall so find and the proceeding shall be terminated and no further proceedings shall be had or taken pursuant to the petition. If the proceeding is so terminated by the filing of a written majority protest or objection, a new petition for the same or substantially the same district may not be filed until the expiration of two years from the date of the finding that such protest or objection has been filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7024.

If, after concluding the hearing, the board of supervisors determines that the proposed harbor development will benefit the property within the proposed district, as originally proposed or as changed by the board of supervisors, and that the proceedings have been regularly had and taken it shall so find by resolution. The resolution shall also contain:

(a) The name of the proposed district, as determined by the board of supervisors.

(b) The official name by which the harbor will be known, as determined by the board of supervisors.

(c) A description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed district, as finally determined by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7025.

A finding of the board of supervisors of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and that notice shall be conclusive against all persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election on Formation [7030. - 7037.]

7030.

After adoption of the resolution provided for in Section 7024 the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of an election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not it shall be formed and for the election of five persons who shall serve as the first directors of the district if the district is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7031.

The resolution calling the election shall contain:

(a) The date of the election.

(b) The name of the proposed district.

(c) The official name by which the harbor will be known.

(d) A description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed district.

(e) The hours that the polls will be open, the election precincts, the polling place or places and the election board or boards appointed to conduct the election.

(f) The statement of the proposition to be voted upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7032.

The election shall be called and conducted and candidates nominated in the manner provided for general district elections, except that the board of supervisors shall establish election precincts, designate the polling place or places, appoint the election board or boards and canvass the returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7033.

The resolution calling the election shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed district is located, the first publication to be at least 30 days prior to the date of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7033.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed.

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

7033.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

7033.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

7033.4.

The elections officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following, in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition, prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7034.

The vote shall be canvassed by the board of supervisors not more than 10 days after the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7035.

If less than a majority of the votes cast upon the proposition are in favor of forming the district the board of supervisors shall declare the proceedings terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7036.

If a majority of the votes cast upon the proposition are in favor of forming the district the board of supervisors shall by resolution declare the district duly organized under this part. Said resolution shall state:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The official name by which the harbor will be known.

(c) The exterior boundaries of the district.

A certified copy of the resolution declaring the district formed shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The organization of the district shall then be complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7037.

No informality in any proceeding, including informality in the conduct of the election not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any person, shall invalidate the formation of the district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of the formation of a district is denied shall be commenced within six months from the date of filing of the certified copy of the resolution declaring the district formed with the Secretary of State; otherwise the formation and legal existence of the district and all proceedings in respect thereto shall be incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization [7040. - 7074.]



  ARTICLE 1. Directors [7040. - 7048.]

7040.

Each district shall have a board of five directors all of whom shall be registered electors residing within the boundaries of the district and all of whom shall be elected at large. The directors first elected upon the formation of the district shall classify themselves by lot so that two of them shall hold office until the election and qualification of their successors at the first succeeding general district election, and three of them shall hold office until the election and qualification of their successors in the second general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7041.

The term of office of each director, other than directors first elected or directors appointed to fill an unexpired term, shall be four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7042.

If a person elected fails to qualify, the office shall be filled as if there were a vacancy in the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7043.

All vacancies occurring in the office of director shall be filled by appointment by the remaining directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.

An appointment to fill a vacancy in the office of director shall be for the unexpired term of the office in which the vacancy exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7045.

Each director elected or appointed shall hold office until his successor qualifies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7046.

If and when the territory included within the district lies entirely within a single city, the legislative body of such city shall be ex officio the board of directors of the district. In such a case, the presiding officer of such legislative body shall be ex officio the president of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 378.)
-------------------------------------------

7047.

Each director shall receive a sum as may be fixed by the board, not exceeding fifty dollars ($50) for each meeting of the board attended by him or her, for not exceeding four meetings in any calendar month. A director may also receive traveling and other expenses incurred by him or her when performing duties for the district other than attending board meetings. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7048.

Before entering upon the duties of his office each director shall take and subscribe the official oath and file it with the secretary. The oath of office may be taken before the secretary, any member of the board of directors, or any officers authorized by law to administer oaths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Board [7050. - 7061.]

7050.

The board is the governing body of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.

The powers of the district shall, except as otherwise provided in this part, be exercised by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7052.

Within 30 days after the formation of the district the directors shall meet and organize as a board. The board shall:

(a) Elect one of its members president except in a case where Section 7046 applies.

(b) Provide for the time and place of holding its regular meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7053.

At its organization meeting the board may transact any business of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7053.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7055.

The board may act either by ordinance, resolution, order or motion. No ordinance or resolution shall be passed or become effective without at least the affirmative votes of a majority of the then members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.

Separate books may be maintained for the filing of ordinances and resolutions but the ayes and noes shall be taken upon the passage of all ordinances and resolutions and entered upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7057.

The enacting clause of all ordinances passed by the board shall be in substantially the following form: “Be it Ordained by the Board of Directors of (____ naming the district) as follows:”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.

The board may pass all ordinances necessary for the regulation of the district. All ordinances shall be signed by the president and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7059.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7060.

The board may adopt a seal for the district and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7061.

By resolution the board may change the name of the district. A change of name shall be effective upon the filing of a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State and recording a certified copy in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Officers and Employees [7070. - 7074.]

7070.

The board shall at its first meeting, or as soon thereafter as practical, appoint a secretary and treasurer. The board shall also appoint other officers that are necessary or convenient for the business of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 378.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.

A director shall not be treasurer. The secretary and treasurer shall receive the compensation determined by the board and shall serve at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7072.

The board may, at any time, appoint or employ, fix the compensation of and prescribe the authority and duties of other officers, employees, attorneys, engineers and consultants necessary or convenient for the business of the district, each of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

When, pursuant to Section 7046, the legislative body of a city is the board of directors of a district, and appoints the administrative officer of the district, he shall have the authority to appoint, employ, and to fix the compensation of and prescribe the authority and duties of, the employees of the district, excluding attorneys, auditors or consultants. The employees employed or appointed by the administrative officer shall serve at his pleasure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 651.)
-------------------------------------------

7073.

The board may require the secretary, treasurer or other officers, employees or assistants of the district to give a bond to the district conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties in an amount as the board may provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7074.

The treasurer shall receive and safely keep all moneys of the district. He shall comply with all provisions of law governing the deposit and securing of public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Elections [7080. - 7121.]



  ARTICLE 1. Elections Generally [7080. - 7090.]

7080.

(a) Except for the first election, directors shall be elected at general district elections. All other elections are special district elections. The first general district election shall be held on the same day as and shall be fully consolidated with the next statewide direct primary which is held more than six months subsequent to the formation of the district and succeeding general district elections shall be held on the same day and shall be fully consolidated with the succeeding statewide direct primaries.

(b) No notice of a general district election need be given. The precincts, polling places and election officers shall, within the district, be the same as those provided for the statewide direct primary and the elections shall be held in all respects as if there were only one election and only one form of ballot shall be used unless some precincts are not entirely the same for both elections, in which case separate ballots may be provided as necessary.

(c) The district shall pay to the county the actual cost of the services rendered in conducting the election upon presentation to the board of a properly approved bill from the county. The returns shall be canvassed by the county officer or officers required to canvass the returns of the statewide direct primary and a certificate stating the result of the canvass shall be filed with the board who shall declare the result and declare elected the persons having the highest number of votes given for each office.

(d) The certificate shall be retained in the district records and the results and declaration shall be entered on the minutes of the board. The secretary shall deliver to each person elected a certificate of election signed by the secretary and authenticated with the seal of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7081.

Nomination papers for the office of director shall be signed by 25 or more registered electors in the district and filed with the secretary not more than 65 nor less than 40 days before the day of election. Otherwise the directors shall be nominated in accordance with the provisions for independent nominations set forth in Part 2 (commencing at Section 8300) of Division 8 of the Elections Code so far as they may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7082.

The provisions of the Elections Code relating to the qualifications of electors, the manner of voting, the duties of election officers, the canvassing of returns, and all other particulars in respect to the management of general elections so far as they may be applicable shall govern all district elections, except:

(a) To the extent that the provisions of the Elections Code pertaining to the conduct of local elections are inconsistent with the provisions of that code pertaining to general elections the provisions of the Elections Code pertaining to local elections shall control.

(b) Inconsistent provisions of this part shall control over any provisions of the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7083.

If there is but one person to be elected to an office, the candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast for the candidates for that office shall be declared elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7084.

If there are two or more persons to be elected to an office, those candidates equal in number to the number to be elected who receive the highest number of votes for the office shall be declared elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.

If a proposition has been submitted at the election it shall be declared carried if a majority of those voting thereon, or a higher number as may be required by law, vote in favor thereof. Otherwise it shall be declared defeated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7086.

Special district elections held under this part or under any other law shall be called, held and conducted as provided in this part or in said other law if it so provides, but if no provision is made therein the election shall be called by resolution which shall state:

(a) The date of the election.

(b) The hours during which the polls shall remain open.

(c) The election precinct or precincts, the polling place or places and the names of the officers selected to conduct the election, who shall consist of one inspector, one judge and two clerks in each precinct.

(d) The measure or measures to be submitted to the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7087.

Notice of the holding of the election shall be given by publishing the resolution calling the election pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in at least one newspaper published in the district, the first publication to be at least two weeks prior to the date of the election. If there is no newspaper published in the district the resolution shall be posted in three public places in the district not less than two weeks prior to the date of the election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7088.

The returns of the election shall be made, the votes canvassed at least seven days following the election, and the results thereof ascertained and declared in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they may be applicable, except as otherwise provided in this part. The secretary, as soon as the result is declared, shall enter in the district records a statement of the result.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7089.

No irregularities or informalities in conducting any district election shall invalidate the same, if the election shall have been otherwise fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7090.

All the expenses of district elections shall be borne by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointments in Lieu of Election [7100. - 7101.]

7100.

If, on the tenth day after the time for nominating directors has expired, only one person has been nominated for each of the positions of director to be filled at that election and a petition signed by 5 percent of the voters of the district requesting that the election be held has not been presented to the board of supervisors, an election shall not be held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7101.

In such case the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated shall, at its next regular meeting, appoint to the positions of directors those persons nominated, and the person shall qualify, take office, and serve exactly as if elected at the general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Initiative; Referendum; Recall [7120. - 7121.]

7120.
